Washington statutes.
RCW 19.25.820

Chapter not applicable to defined public record.

This chapter shall not be applicable to any recording defined as a public record of any court, legislative body, or proceedings of any public body, whether or not a fee is charged or collected for copies.

[ 1991 c 38 s 8.]